apertium-sme-sma.sma.lexc
! =============================
! Compounding - copied from SMJ
! =============================
LEXICON R
 #+Use/Circ:# Noun;                           ! This is the normal case.		         
 #@P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ:#@P.NeedNoun.ON@ Verb;      ! Flag diacr declares that the compound   
 #@P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ:#@P.NeedNoun.ON@ Adjective; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation  
 +Hyph#+Use/Circ:%- Noun ;                        ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so     
 +Hyph#+Use/Circ:%-@P.NeedNoun.ON@  Verb ;        ! Sem-julggaštus and the like	      
 +Hyph#+Use/Circ:%-@P.NeedNoun.ON@  Adjective ;   ! is allowed.			              
! # ProperNoun ;     ! Now, let us allow proper nouns as the 2nd part of com- ^C^
 #+Use/Circ:%- ProperNoun ;  ! pounds. Thus: London-Hull, LondonHull, Hull-viessu      
                    ! and viessuLondon are now all ok. Some refinement could  ^C^
                    ! perhaps be done, but corpus research is needed.	      ^C^
 +Cmpnd:%- # ;     ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller

LEXICON RAbbr !From abbreviations and acronyms to avoid two hyphens: a-- and ...
 #+Use/Circ:# Noun;                              ! This is the normal case.               
! # NounSecond ;                       ! Testing some quasisuff, cf. noun file  ^C^
 #@P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ:#@P.NeedNoun.ON@ Verb;              ! Flag diacr declares that the compound  
! #@P.NeedNoun.ON@  AdjectiveRoot ;    ! needs a N tag later in the derivation ^C^
 +Hyph#+Use/Circ:%- Noun ;                      ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so         
 +Hyph#+Use/Circ:%-@P.NeedNoun.ON@  Verb ;      ! Sem-julggaštus and the like	        
 +Hyph#+Use/Circ:%-@P.NeedNoun.ON@  Adjective ; ! is allowed.                            
!# ProperNoun ;     ! Now, let us allow proper nouns as the 2nd part of com-    ^C^
!#:%- ProperNoun ;  ! pounds. Thus: London-Hull, LondonHull, Hull-viessu        ^C^
                    ! and viessuLondon are now all ok. Some refinement could    ^C^
                    ! perhaps be done, but corpus research is needed.	        ^C^
 +Cmpnd: # ;        ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller

! ============================
! Nominal inflection sublexica
! ============================

! Inflection for odd-syllable nouns
! ---------------------------------
LEXICON N_ODD
 +N+Sg: N_ODD_SG ;
 +N+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:e%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:e%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;


LEXICON N_ODD_SG
  +Nom:e%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg1:%>amme FINAL1 ;
  +Nom+PxSg2:%>adth FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
  +Acc+PxSg2:%>amth FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg1:%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg2:%>anne FINAL1 ;
  +Gen+PxSg3:%>anne FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
  +Ill+PxSg2:%>assedh FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Com+PxSg2:%>æjnedh FINAL1 ;

LEXICON N_ODD_PL
  +Nom:%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Use/Sub:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !

LEXICON N_ODD_ESS
  +Ess:%>inie          FINAL1 ;
  
LEXICON N_ODD_C
 +N+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:e%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;


LEXICON AAJEGE        !Sg+Nom=Aajege/Aajeh  Sg+Cmp=Aajeh-
 +N+Sg+Nom:h%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ge%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ge%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:g%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:g%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:g%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:g%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:g N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:g    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ge%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:g%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:g%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;
  
LEXICON AAREGE        !Sg+Nom=Aarege/Aareh  Sg+Cmp=Aarege-/Aareh-
 +N+Sg+Nom:h%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ge%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ge%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:g%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:g%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:g%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:g%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:g N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:g    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:ge%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ge%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:g%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:g%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON BAARTEGE        !Sg+Nom=baartege/baarth  Sg+Cmp=baartege-/baarth-
 +N+Sg+Nom:h%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ege%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ege%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:eg%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:eg%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:eg%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eg%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:eg N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:eg    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:ege%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ege%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:eg%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:eg%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;


LEXICON GAAJSEGE        !Sg+Nom=gaajsege/gaajsh  Sg+Cmp=gaajsh-
 +N+Sg+Nom:h%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ege%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ege%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:eg%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:eg%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:eg%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eg%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:eg N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:eg    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ege%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:eg%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:eg%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON LAADTEGE        !Sg+Nom=laadtege  Sg+Cmp=laadth-
 +N+Sg+Nom:ege%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ege%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ege%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:eg%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:eg%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:eg%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eg%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:eg N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:eg    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ege%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:eg%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:eg%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;
  
LEXICON SAADTEGE        !Sg+Nom=saadtege  Sg+Cmp=saadtege-/saadth-
 +N+Sg+Nom:ege%^DISIMP         FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ege%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ege%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:eg%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Sg+Ine:eg%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:eg%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eg%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl:eg N_ODD_PL ;
 +N:eg    N_ODD_ESS ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:h%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgNomCmp:ege%^DISIMP            R ;
  +N+SgGenCmp:ege%>%^DISIMPn        R ;
  +N+PlGenCmp:eg%>%^DISIMPi R ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dim+N:eg%»adtj GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON Noun
aajege:aaje AAJEGE ;
aajhtere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:aajhter N_ODD ; !
aalhtere:aalhtar N_ODD ;
aalkove+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:aalkov N_ODD ; !
aaltere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:aaltar N_ODD ; !
aamhtese:aamhtes N_ODD ;
aejlege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:aejlieg N_ODD ; !
aerede+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:aeried N_ODD ; !
almetje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:almetj N_ODD ; !
baenie#dåaktere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:baenie#dåaktar N_ODD ; !
bangseme:bangsem N_ODD ;
bïerjese:bïerjes N_ODD ;
duvvehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:duvviehk N_ODD ; !
dåaktere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dåaktar N_ODD ; !
dååpmehke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:dååpmehk N_ODD ; !
eatneme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:eatnam N_ODD ; !
eengkele+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:eengkel N_ODD ; !
gaskestalleme:gaskestallem N_ODD ;
gejhkehke:gejhkiehk N_ODD ;
guedtede+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:guedtied N_ODD ; !
gïerene+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gïeren N_ODD ; !
håaleme:håalem N_ODD ;
håannege+Use/Sub:håanneg N_ODD ; ! 
jeestere:jeester N_ODD ;
jemhkelde+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:jemhkield N_ODD ; !
jemhkele+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:jemhkiel N_ODD ; !
jiehtege:jiehtieg N_ODD ;
jupmele+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:jupmiel N_ODD ; !
jåvle#vadtese:jåvle#vadtes N_ODD ;
jöömmetje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:jöömmetj N_ODD ; !
leerehte:leereht N_ODD ;
meetere:meeter N_ODD ;
nahkere:nahkar N_ODD ;
njoektjeme:njoektjem N_ODD ;
reakta#öörnege:reakta#öörneg N_ODD ;
rïektese:rïektes N_ODD ;
rïesege:rïeseg N_ODD ;
reajnoe#almetje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:reajnoe#almetj N_ODD ; !
saevege:saevieg N_ODD "flagg" ; ! gaamegisnie
searome:searoem N_ODD ;
soejkesje:soejkesj N_ODD ;
steeblege:steeble AAJEGE ;
svaalhtese:svaalhtes N_ODD ;
sïetere:sïeter N_ODD ;
teekste#gïetedalleme:teekste#gïetedallem N_ODD ;
tjalmese:tjalmes N_ODD ;
tjeanere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tjeanar N_ODD ; !
tjearone:tjearoen N_ODD ;
tjoevtenje:tjoevtenj N_ODD ;
tjïengele:tjïengel N_ODD ;
trööhnege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:trööhneg N_ODD ; !
tåallere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tåaller N_ODD ; !
veartene+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:veartan N_ODD ; !
vedtneme:vedtnem N_ODD ;
veeljeme:veeljem N_ODD ;
voejkene+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:voejken N_ODD ; !
vuanove+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:vuanav N_ODD "svigermor" ;  !
åakere:åaker N_ODD ;
